Maryland, session 2025, HB0859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(f) “Department” means the State Department of Education.
2–107.
7–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Prekindergarten provider hub” means a coordinated partnership between
eligible prekindergarten providers and other entities established by the Department under
§ 7–1A–09 of this subtitle.
Article – Insurance
31–125.
THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE MARYLAND HEALTH
BENEFIT EXCHANGE, SHALL PROMOTE ACCESS TO HEALTH INSURANCE FOR CHILD
CARE PROFESSIONALS BY:
(1) PARTNERING PARTNERING WITH:
(I) PREKINDERGARTEN THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION;
(II) PREKINDERGARTEN PROVIDER HUBS, AS DEFINED IN §
7–1A–01 OF THIS ARTICLE THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(II) (III) CHILD CHILD CARE ASSOCIATIONS; AND
(III) (IV) RELEVANT RELEVANT NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS;
(2) HELPING HELPING CHILD CARE PROFESSIONALS OBTAIN HEALTH
INSURANCE THROUGH THE MARYLAND HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE OR
MEDICAID;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 679
(3) ASSISTING ASSISTING CHILD CARE PROFESSIONALS WHO LOSE
MEDICAID COVERAGE WITH FINDING ALTERNATIVE HEALTH INSURANCE OPTIONS;
(4) HELPING HELPING ENSURE HEALTH PLAN OPTIONS MEET THE
BUDGETS AND HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE NEEDS OF CHILD CARE
PROFESSIONALS AND CHILD CARE EMPLOYERS; AND
(5) PROVIDING PROVIDING INFORMATIONAL RESOURCES OR
REFERRALS FOR ADDITIONAL SUPPORT, INCLUDING FLYERS, WEBINARS,
IN–PERSON EVENTS, AND OTHER OUTREACH MATERIALS TARGETED TO THE CHILD
CARE PROVIDER COMMUNITY; AND
(6) ASSESSING CURRENT LEVELS OF HEALTH CARE ACCESS ACROSS
THE CHILD CARE COMMUNITY BY CONDUCTING A SURVEY:
(I) DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND RELEVANT NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(II) WITH A PARTICULAR EMPHASIS ON PROVIDERS WHO
ACCEPT CHILD CARE SCHOLARSHIP VOUCHERS.
7–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Prekindergarten provider hub” means a coordinated partnership between
eligible prekindergarten providers and other entities established by the Department under
§ 7–1A–09 of this subtitle.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “County board” means the board of education of a county.
(2) “County board” includes the Baltimore City Board of School
Commissioners.
(c) “Program” means the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare
Benefits Program.
– 3 –

Ch. 679 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) “Satellite organization” means any organization or entity whose employees
are eligible to participate in the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits
Program as a separate account.
(e) “Wellness program” means a program that is designed to:
(1) promote health or prevent or detect disease or illness;
(2) improve clinical outcomes;
(3) prevent or reduce acute admissions and readmissions to health care
facilities;
(4) improve treatment compliance for chronic conditions;
(5) promote healthy behaviors; or
(6) prevent or control injury.
2–512.
(a) In this section, “qualifying nonprofit organization” means an organization
that:
(1) (i) 1. receives State funds from the Maryland Department of
Health that cover more than one–third of the organization’s operating expenses; OR
2. IS A CHILD CARE PROVIDER THAT RECEIVES FUNDS
FROM A UNIT OF STATE, LOCAL, OR FEDERAL GOVERNMENT THAT COVER MORE
THAN TWO–THIRDS OF THE ORGANIZATION’S OPERATING EXPENSES; and
(ii) is:
1. described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
2. exempt from income tax under § 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(2) is the Legal Aid Bureau, Inc.;
(3) is a corporation, a limited liability company, or any other entity that is
wholly owned by the Legal Aid Bureau, Inc.; or
(4) is the Maryland Crime Victims’ Resource Center.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 679
(b) The Secretary shall adopt regulations for the enrollment and participation of
employees of a qualifying nonprofit organization to participate in the Program as a satellite
organization.
(c) A qualifying nonprofit organization that participates in the Program as a
satellite organization shall:
(1) pay to the State:
(i) a premium in the amount determined by the Secretary; and
(ii) any costs, as determined by the Secretary, for the administration
of this Program; and
(2) determine the extent to which the organization will subsidize
participation by its employees in the Program.
(d) The participation of a satellite organization in the Program may not impede,
undermine, or conflict with the Program’s federal compliance obligations or governmental
and cafeteria plan status, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 125.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –